src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
# Documenting the Viena Karelian Verb lexicon.

The verb lexicon contains two groups of continuation lexica
One, with names like VERB_KUUL/UO (in capital letters and indicating stem)
have analyses like the Finnish fst (without twolc). The other group has
contlexes with nams *verb, verb_frekv, verb_intr*, etc. They have
analyses more like the Kven and Meänkieli ones (with gradation and
harmony as twolc processes.

**TODO:** Clean up this and go for one of the two.

**LEXICON Verbs** contains the stem list
* olla+V:o AUX_O/LLA ;
* ei+V+Neg:e AUX_E/I ;
* voija+V:vo AUX_VO/IJA ;
* piteä+V:pi AUX_PI/TEÄ ;
... some 200 more verbs

### The second list of verbs
This contains just the infinitive and points to defect paradigms for now.

* aakkoa verb ;
* ahahella verb_frekv ;
* ahavakoittuo verb ; 
* ahavastuo verb ;

## The intermediate lexica
These lexica redirects the stem to different person-number sublexica.

**LEXICON kavota_katuo_verb** ... This lexicon does not work, as both stems go to the same contlex.
* kavota verb ; 
* kavota:katuo verb ; 

**LEXICON proššai(k)koa_verb_vaill**

**LEXICON sevota_verb**

**LEXICON stavaikkoa_verb_vaill** 

**LEXICON tavai(k)koa_tavaite_verb_vaill**

**LEXICON tuta_verb**

**LEXICON viyhtie_verb**

**LEXICON voulie_vuolie_verb**

**LEXICON kirjut/tua__verb** 

**LEXICON VERB_J/IÄHÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_V/IIJÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_Š/YYVVÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_L/UUVVA** 

**LEXICON VERB_Š/YYVÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_J/UUVA** 

**LEXICON VERB_PIÄS/TÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_KÄ/YVÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_S/UAHA** 

**LEXICON VERB_MIET/TIE** 

**LEXICON VERB_LÄ/HTIE** 

**LEXICON VERB_T/UUVVA** 

**LEXICON VERB_TU/LLA** 

**LEXICON VERB_KUOL/LA** 

**LEXICON VERB_PA/ISSA** 

**LEXICON VERB_NOU/ŠŠA** 

**LEXICON VERB_PAN/NA** 

**LEXICON VERB_MÄN/NÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_TARVI/TA** 

**LEXICON VERB_MERKI/TÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_STARINOI/JA** 

**LEXICON VERB_IKÄVÖI/JÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_ŠAN/OA** 

**LEXICON VERB_MUISTEL/EHTOA** 

**LEXICON VERB_KAŠV/OA** 

**LEXICON VERB_AL/KOA** 

**LEXICON VERB_AN/TOA** 

**LEXICON VERB_PAIS/TOA** 

**LEXICON VERB_KAČ/ČUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_KAČ/ČOA** 

**LEXICON VERB_KOROŠ/TOA** 

**LEXICON VERB_VALMIS/TOA** 

**LEXICON VERB_TAH/TOA** 

**LEXICON VERB_KARJ/UO** 

**LEXICON VERB_TAP/PUA** 

**LEXICON VERB_TAP/POA** 

**LEXICON VERB_SOIT/TOA** 

**LEXICON VERB_OT/TOA** 

**LEXICON VERB_TANŠŠI/E** 

**LEXICON VERB_EČ/ČIE** 

**LEXICON VERB_POIMI/E** 

**LEXICON VERB_IT/KIE** 

**LEXICON VERB_KITK/IE** 

**LEXICON VERB_LAŠ/KIE** 

**LEXICON VERB_KÄŠ/KIE** 

**LEXICON VERB_OP/PIE** 

**LEXICON VERB_ŠO/PIE** 

**LEXICON VERB_TUN/TIE** 

**LEXICON VERB_LUA/TIE** 

**LEXICON VERB_TI/ETEÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_TÄYT/TYÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_TYÖN/TYÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_NÄYT/TYÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_VIČER/TEÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_PIÄT/TEÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_TYÖN/TEÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_LÖY/TEÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_JÄRJEŠ/TEÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_PI/TYÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_PIÄŠ/TYÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_OPAŠ/TUA** 

**LEXICON VERB_OPAŠ/TUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_TOIV/UO** 

**LEXICON VERB_VOIT/TUA** 

**LEXICON VERB_KAN/TUA** 

**LEXICON VERB_AUT/TUA**

**LEXICON VERB_RUA/TUA**

**LEXICON VERB_RUA/TUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_TAH/TUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_KUUL/UO** 

**LEXICON VERB_LOP/PUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_RYH/TYÖ** 

**LEXICON VERB_PISY/Ö** 

**LEXICON VERB_ILMEŠ/TYÖ** 

**LEXICON VERB_IS/TUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_RIK/KUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_ROIK/KUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_SAT/TUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_KER/TUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_ŠI/TUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_KUČ/ČUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_VAI/PUO** 

**LEXICON VERB_KER/ÄTÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_KER/ITÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_N/ÄHÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_AV/ATA** 

**LEXICON VERB_RU/VETA** 

**LEXICON VERB_KERÄ/TÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_LEIK/ATA** 

**LEXICON VERB_ŠAL/VATA** 

**LEXICON VERB_ŠAL/VATA** 

**LEXICON VERB_NIM/ETÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_TYK/YTÄ** CHECKME 20250831

**LEXICON VERB_TYK/ÄTÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_HYREYTY/Ä** 

**LEXICON VERB_PUREŠKEL/LA** 

**LEXICON VERB_AJAT/ELLA** 

**LEXICON VERB_LEVÄHEL/LÄ** 

**LEXICON VERB_OM/MELLA** 

**LEXICON VERB_O/LLA** 

**LEXICON AUX_O/LLA** 

**LEXICON AUX_E/I** 

**LEXICON AUX_VO/IJA** 

**LEXICON AUX_PI/TEÄ** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-krl/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc)</small>
